Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 536.13, subsections 1, 2, and 3, Code 2026, are amended by striking the subsections. Sec. 2. Section 536.13, subsections 4 and 5, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 4. Beginning July 4, 1965, and until such time as a different rate is fixed by the superintendent, the The maximum rate of interest or charges upon the class or classes of regulated loans is as follows: shall be three percent per month. a. Three percent per month on any part of the unpaid principal balance of the loan not exceeding one hundred fifty dollars. b. Two percent per month on any part of the loan in excess of one hundred fifty dollars, but not exceeding three hundred dollars. c. One and one-half percent per month on any part of the unpaid principal balance of the loan in excess of three hundred dollars, but not exceeding seven hundred dollars. d. One percent per month on any part of the unpaid principal balance of the loan in excess of seven hundred dollars. 5. A licensee under this chapter may lend any sum of money not exceeding the threshold amount as defined in section House File 2329, p. 2 537.1301 in amount and may charge, contract for, and receive on the loan interest or charges at a rate not exceeding the maximum rate of interest or charges determined and fixed by the superintendent under authority of this section or pursuant to subsection 7 for those amounts in excess of ten thousand dollars 4 . Sec. 3. Section 536.13, subsection 7, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. Sec. 4. Section 537.2501, subsection 1, paragraph l, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: l. For a consumer credit transaction, a service charge in an amount not to exceed the lesser of ten either three percent of the amount financed or thirty one hundred dollars. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2329, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor